Washington statutes.
RCW 18.74.020

Board created—Members—Staff assistance—Compensation and travel expenses.

The state board of physical therapy is hereby created. The board shall consist of seven members who shall be appointed by the governor. Five members of the board shall be physical therapists licensed under this chapter and residing in this state, shall have not less than five years' experience in the practice of physical therapy, and shall be actively engaged in practice within two years of appointment. One member shall be a physical therapist assistant licensed under this chapter and residing in this state, shall not have less than five years' experience in the practice of physical therapy, and shall be actively engaged in practice within two years of appointment. The seventh member shall be appointed from the public at large, shall have an interest in the rights of consumers of health services, and shall not be or have been a member of any other licensing board, a licensee of any health occupation board, an employee of any health facility nor derive his or her primary livelihood from the provision of health services at any level of responsibility. In the event that a member of the board for any reason cannot complete his or her term of office, another appointment shall be made by the governor in accordance with the procedure stated in this section to fill the remainder of the term. No member may serve for more than two consecutive full four-year terms.

The secretary of health shall furnish such secretarial, clerical, and other assistance as the board may require. Each member of the board shall, in addition to travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060, be compensated in accordance with RCW 43.03.265. The board is designated as a class five group for purposes of chapter 43.03 RCW.

[ 2022 c 240 s 5; 2007 c 98 s 2; 1991 c 3 s 174; 1984 c 287 s 46; 1983 c 116 s 3; 1979 c 158 s 62; 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 34 s 44; 1949 c 239 s 2; Rem. Supp. 1949 s 10163-2.]

NOTES:

Legislative findings—Severability—Effective date—1984 c 287: See notes following RCW 43.03.220.

Severability—Effective date—1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 34: See notes following RCW 2.08.115.

Secretary of health or designee ex officio member of health professional licensure and disciplinary boards: RCW 43.70.300.